src/nlpia/data/words_libre_office_names_us.aff
REP 114
REP a ei
REP a ey
REP ai ie
REP air ear
REP air ere
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP cc k
REP ch k
REP ch s
REP ch te
REP ch ti
REP ch tu
REP ci s
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP dg j
REP di j
REP ear air
REP ear are
REP ear ere
REP ear ier
REP eau o
REP ee i
REP eg e.g.
REP ei a
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP eness ity
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ew o
REP ew oo
REP ew u
REP ew ue
REP ew ui
REP ey a
REP f gh
REP f gh
REP f ph
REP f ugh
REP ff ugh
REP ge j
REP gg j
REP gh f
REP gh f
REP ght t
REP gotten got
REP i ee
REP i igh
REP i uy
REP ie ai
REP ie i.e.
REP ier ear
REP ieu oo
REP ieu u
REP igh i
REP j dg
REP j di
REP j ge
REP j gg
REP k cc
REP k ch
REP k qu
REP kw qu
REP leness ility
REP ness ity
REP ness ivity
REP o eau
REP o ew
REP oe u
REP og ogue
REP ok OK
REP oo ew
REP oo ieu
REP oo u
REP oo ui
REP ph f
REP ph f
REP qu k
REP qu w
REP rised rose
REP s ch
REP s ci
REP s ti
REP shun cion
REP shun sion
REP shun tion
REP ss z
REP t ght
REP te ch
REP teached taught
REP ti ch
REP ti s
REP tion ssion
REP ts ce
REP tu ch
REP u ew
REP u ieu
REP u oe
REP u oo
REP u ough
REP ue ew
REP uf ough
REP uff ough
REP ui ew
REP ui oo
REP uy i
REP w qu
REP w ugh
REP ys ies
REP z ss

FLAG num
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 0 ra .
SFX 339 Y 1
SFX 339 0 rd .
SFX 785 Y 1
SFX 785 0 re .
SFX 820 Y 1
SFX 820 0 ngton's .
SFX 540 Y 1
SFX 540 0 ri .
SFX 403 Y 1
SFX 403 0 rs .
SFX 526 Y 1
SFX 526 0 rt .
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 0 ry .
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 0 sa .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 ten's .
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 se .
SFX 751 Y 1
SFX 751 0 sh .
SFX 579 Y 1
SFX 579 0 lock's .
SFX 636 Y 1
SFX 636 0 dley .
SFX 391 Y 1
SFX 391 0 sy .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 a .
SFX 667 Y 1
SFX 667 0 al's .
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 0 d .
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 e .
SFX 59 Y 1
SFX 59 0 g .
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 0 h .
SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 0 i .
SFX 157 Y 1
SFX 157 0 k .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 l .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 0 m .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 n .
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 0 o .
SFX 542 Y 1
SFX 542 0 p .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 r .
SFX 783 Y 1
SFX 783 0 rell's .
SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 0 s .
SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25 0 t .
SFX 688 Y 1
SFX 688 0 w .
SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 0 y .
SFX 674 Y 1
SFX 674 0 z .
SFX 962 Y 1
SFX 962 0 cie's .
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 0 ta .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 te .
SFX 387 Y 1
SFX 387 0 ti .
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 tt .
SFX 274 Y 1
SFX 274 0 ty .
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 wood's .
SFX 612 Y 1
SFX 612 0 ington .
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 us .
SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92 0 lle's .
SFX 497 Y 1
SFX 497 0 tine's .
SFX 818 Y 1
SFX 818 0 nia's .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 la's .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 bra's .
SFX 696 Y 1
SFX 696 0 va .
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 lin's .
SFX 796 Y 1
SFX 796 0 ot's .
SFX 436 Y 1
SFX 436 0 lynn's .
SFX 461 Y 1
SFX 461 0 gan's .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 ya's .
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 0 mond's .
SFX 371 Y 1
SFX 371 0 ham .
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 0 han .
SFX 663 Y 1
SFX 663 0 any's .
SFX 939 Y 1
SFX 939 0 encia .
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 0 atha's .
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 ina's .
SFX 744 Y 1
SFX 744 0 sley's .
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 0 sen's .
SFX 788 Y 1
SFX 788 0 rda's .
SFX 707 Y 1
SFX 707 0 topher's .
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 lock .
SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 0 by's .
SFX 482 Y 1
SFX 482 0 ya .
SFX 993 Y 1
SFX 993 0 ye .
SFX 608 Y 1
SFX 608 0 isha .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 0 yl .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 0 yn .
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 ce's .
SFX 971 Y 1
SFX 971 0 bie's .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 za .
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 0 io's .
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 0 lis's .
SFX 963 Y 1
SFX 963 0 cie .
SFX 356 Y 1
SFX 356 0 lene .
SFX 624 Y 1
SFX 624 0 house .
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 0 ara's .
SFX 841 Y 1
SFX 841 0 mae .
SFX 878 Y 1
SFX 878 0 kin's .
SFX 117 Y 1
SFX 117 0 man .
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 0 ley's .
SFX 372 Y 1
SFX 372 0 ger's .
SFX 616 Y 1
SFX 616 0 iko's .
SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 0 sa's .
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 d's .
SFX 569 Y 1
SFX 569 0 ms's .
SFX 574 Y 1
SFX 574 0 mer .
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 0 less .
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 0 rose .
SFX 386 Y 1
SFX 386 0 ti's .
SFX 299 Y 1
SFX 299 0 lia's .
SFX 960 Y 1
SFX 960 0 co's .
SFX 872 Y 1
SFX 872 0 lah's .
SFX 789 Y 1
SFX 789 0 rda .
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 0 nette's .
SFX 938 Y 1
SFX 938 0 encia's .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 i's .
SFX 982 Y 1
SFX 982 0 ala's .
SFX 906 Y 1
SFX 906 0 inson's .
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 0 mie .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 etta .
SFX 67 Y 1
SFX 67 0 ette .
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 0 tie's .
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 0 ret .
SFX 346 Y 1
SFX 346 0 nd's .
SFX 687 Y 1
SFX 687 0 way .
SFX 249 Y 1
SFX 249 0 land's .
SFX 507 Y 1
SFX 507 0 tal's .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 igan's .
SFX 429 Y 1
SFX 429 0 ma's .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 0 n's .
SFX 539 Y 1
SFX 539 0 ria .
SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 0 rie .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 ni's .
SFX 672 Y 1
SFX 672 0 za's .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 0 pson .
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 0 sie's .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 marie's .
SFX 956 Y 1
SFX 956 0 de's .
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 0 ella .
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 elle .
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 0 an's .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 s's .
SFX 437 Y 1
SFX 437 0 lynn .
SFX 794 Y 1
SFX 794 0 ott's .
SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 0 nn's .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 nne's .
SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 0 etta's .
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 ford .
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 nda's .
SFX 473 Y 1
SFX 473 0 een .
SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 0 rie's .
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 ena's .
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 0 as's .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 ise's .
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 ta's .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 ns's .
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 0 er's .
SFX 840 Y 1
SFX 840 0 mae's .
SFX 424 Y 1
SFX 424 0 more's .
SFX 654 Y 1
SFX 654 0 bury .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 ston .
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 0 anna's .
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 a's .
SFX 552 Y 1
SFX 552 0 nor's .
SFX 658 Y 1
SFX 658 0 belle .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 mond .
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 0 eka .
SFX 196 Y 1
SFX 196 0 ela .
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 0 ell .
SFX 635 Y 1
SFX 635 0 dley's .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 ryl .
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 0 ssa's .
SFX 745 Y 1
SFX 745 0 sley .
SFX 946 Y 1
SFX 946 0 dt's .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 ena .
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 0 ene .
SFX 425 Y 1
SFX 425 0 more .
SFX 508 Y 1
SFX 508 0 tal .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 bi's .
SFX 10 Y 1
SFX 10 0 na's .
SFX 764 Y 1
SFX 764 0 rose's .
SFX 537 Y 1
SFX 537 0 rick .
SFX 621 Y 1
SFX 621 0 ica's .
SFX 824 Y 1
SFX 824 0 nes's .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 's .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 us's .
SFX 657 Y 1
SFX 657 0 belle's .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 ann's .
SFX 748 Y 1
SFX 748 0 sh's .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 nell .
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 0 k's .
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 0 don's .
SFX 937 Y 1
SFX 937 0 era .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 0 ers .
SFX 467 Y 1
SFX 467 0 ert .
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 0 dy's .
SFX 506 Y 1
SFX 506 0 tel .
SFX 632 Y 1
SFX 632 0 ery .
SFX 504 Y 1
SFX 504 0 ten .
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 0 ter .
SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 0 line's .
SFX 342 Y 1
SFX 342 0 ora's .
SFX 150 Y 1
SFX 150 0 ee's .
SFX 362 Y 1
SFX 362 0 ko's .
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 0 ham's .
SFX 959 Y 1
SFX 959 0 dale .
SFX 630 Y 1
SFX 630 0 eth .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 0 ett .
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 0 yce .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 0 on's .
SFX 782 Y 1
SFX 782 0 re's .
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 0 tha .
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 0 inda's .
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 0 topher .
SFX 541 Y 1
SFX 541 0 p's .
SFX 276 Y 1
SFX 276 0 tie .
SFX 267 Y 1
SFX 267 0 ella's .
SFX 718 Y 1
SFX 718 0 tin .
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 0 ha's .
SFX 352 Y 1
SFX 352 0 len's .
SFX 217 Y 1
SFX 217 0 field's .
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 0 ert's .
SFX 919 Y 1
SFX 919 0 gton .
SFX 844 Y 1
SFX 844 0 low's .
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 0 tta's .
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 0 atha .
SFX 660 Y 1
SFX 660 0 bel .
SFX 930 Y 1
SFX 930 0 esha's .
SFX 775 Y 1
SFX 775 0 rine .
SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463 0 gan .
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 ter's .
SFX 629 Y 1
SFX 629 0 eth's .
SFX 935 Y 1
SFX 935 0 erson .
SFX 931 Y 1
SFX 931 0 esha .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 ora .
SFX 801 Y 1
SFX 801 0 ore .
SFX 593 Y 1
SFX 593 0 les's .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 ton .
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 field .
SFX 256 Y 1
SFX 256 0 in's .
SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74 0 nie's .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 le's .
SFX 631 Y 1
SFX 631 0 ery's .
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 0 ana's .
SFX 795 Y 1
SFX 795 0 ott .
SFX 972 Y 1
SFX 972 0 bie .
SFX 990 Y 1
SFX 990 0 yll .
SFX 992 Y 1
SFX 992 0 ye's .
SFX 373 Y 1
SFX 373 0 ger .
SFX 873 Y 1
SFX 873 0 lah .
SFX 671 Y 1
SFX 671 0 z's .
SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 0 ine's .
