src/nlpia/data/words_libre_office_names_us.dic
Andra/1,956
Brown/1,2,3,52,53,108,109,118,119,844,845,858,859
Chi/1,4,5,8,10,11,130,133,559,560,599,635,636
Chris/1,34,273,390,505,507,707
Del/1,32,178,289,309,394,663,902,908,910,962
Eli/1,4,5,8,9,10,11,30,31,170,171,178,179,181,182,183,184,223,224,231,232,552,553,671,672,673,674,794,795,954,955
Ella/1,8,9,96,193,194,840,841
Ewa/1,8,9,524,526
Gill/88,794,914
Green/1,2,3,46,47,152,153,217,218,370,371,686,687
Han/1,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,11,20,21,42,43,54,55,58,59,62,63,154,157,332,333,344,345,372,373,454,455,577,578,647,648,946,947
Hart/1,70,454
Herma/1,8,130,133,146,147,160,161
Hui/1,2,3,748,751
Jama/1,18,36,667
Jean/1,2,3,4,5,10,11,14,15,16,17,40,41,66,67,74,75,84,85,110,122,123,124,125,241,242,261,262,430,431
Jene/695,696
Jenkin/6,7
Jesse/541,818
John/1,4,5,6,7,10,11,14,15,20,21,66,67,74,75,84,85,106,107,229,230,394,395
Kami/872
Kandi/1,6,7,98,99,340,341
Kelle/1,2,3,12,13,94,95,168,180
Ken/1,4,5,10,11,24,25,30,31,32,33,54,55,106,107,269,270,481,482,606,608,629,630
Kirk/1,2,3,152,153,199,200,249,250,710,713
Kris/1,390,707
Leo/34,35,48,49,429,435
Leon/1,2,3,4,5,14,15,32,33,142,143,148,149,166,167,169,259,260,342,343,497,498,543,799,801,910,911
Lilli/1,2,3,4,5,88,89,178,179,378,379,960,961
Lin/1,4,5,8,9,30,31,38,39,42,43,54,55,58,59,66,67,74,75,112,113,152,153,221,222,317,318,372,373,752,753,946,947
Lind/52,53,390,391,752,753
Lock/1,2,3,14,15,152,153,610,612
Lon/1,4,5,10,11,28,29,30,31,58,59,74,75,106,107
Lore/1,2,3,8,10,11,16,17,34,35,64,65,68,69,72,73,88,89
Loren/672,673
Lori/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,10,11,16,17,34,35,102,103,118,119,174,175,408,409,410,411,533,534,572,574,830,831
Luci/1,2,3,4,5,10,11,26,27,38,39,48,49,68,69,92,93,174,175,178,179,201,202,209,210
Mai/1,4,5,6,7,8,9,26,27,30,31,36,37,70,71,104,105,181,182,394,395,641,642,782,785
Marcel/1,4,5,38,39,40,41,50,51,122,123
Marg/1,2,3,12,13,14,15,38,39,122,123,219,220,466,467,631,632,780,781,796,797
Mark/1,6,7,82,83,84,85,201,202
Mary/1,4,5,80,84,85,118,119,249,250,271,272,295,298,378,379,436,437,657,658,764,765
Maud/1,2,3,14,15,744,745
May/1,2,3,4,5,16,17,38,39,104,105,656,657,658,659
Mee/1,20,457,874,878
Meg/1,88,461
Mei/1,8,9
Merri/1,2,3,60,61,116,117,118,119
Min/1,4,5,10,11,30,31,34,35,42,43,58,59,74,75,221,222,549,550,637,640
Mort/1,579,999
Mose/1,6,7,70,71,176,177,916,917
Nan/1,4,5,20,21,66,67,74,75,241,242,481,482,962,963
Nicol/1,2,3,4,5,18,19,26,27,66,67,223,224,661,662
Ora/1,118,299
Pat/1,22,68,273,390,503,536,538,934
Penni/1,2,3,820,821
Peter/1,6,7,20,21,332,333
Ray/1,2,3,6,7,10,11,265,266,292,293,354,356
Rena/1,2,3,12,13,34,35,78,79,126,127,338,339,645,646,868,869
Rich/1,14,124,292
Rob/1,2,3,20,21,24,25,62,63,199,227,228,256,258,309,310,906,907
Ron/1,4,10,11,28,29,30,31,74,75,88,89,106,107,237
Rose/1,80,92,118,174,176,199,296,430,448
Sara/1,8,9,28,29,42,43,146,147,158,159
Scot/1,24,273,275
Sha/2,3,12,13,48,49,50,51,112,113,185,186,577,578,683,688,758,759,783,784,788,789
Shan/1,2,3,4,5,8,9,10,11,22,23,28,29,30,31,34,35,52,53,58,59,82,83,112,113,124,125,126,127,142,143,148,149,169,215,216,261,262,269,270,336,337,386,387,505,506,527,528,637,640,669,670,679,681,768,769,770,771,814,815,944,945
Shanta/2,3,12,13,136
Sharla/346
Sher/1,4,5,12,13,14,15,22,23,28,52,53,70,71,80,81,82,83,116,117,150,151,152,153,185,186,187,215,216,233,234,261,262,354,356,365,367,532,579,580,758,759,783,784,988,989,990,991
Sherri/18,19,60,61,414,415
Soo/1,8,9,154,157
Syme/1,6,7,287,402,403
Tam/1,4,5,14,15,28,104,105,195,196,215,216,289,290,426,427,477,606,608,616,618,621,622,930,931,936,937,944,945,968,969,974,975,976,977,982,983
Ten/1,4,5,74,75,319,474,606,608,930,931
Teri/1,170,197,521
Theo/1,48,762
Tier/1,4,5,104,105,207,208,749,750
Tim/1,6,7,215,216,289,290,569,570
Tindal/1,2,3
Tom/1,28,215,426,616,790,944
Val/1,2,3,30,31,122,123,185,186,211,212,631,632,846,849,938,939
Violet/1,4,5,126,127
Virgil/1,449
Will/1,4,5,6,7,12,13,14,15,20,21,32,33,66,67,84,85,122,123,134,135,166,167,309,310,412,413,424,425,428,434,493,495,512,514,571,573,647,648,914,915
Wood/1,6,7,112,113,372,373,623,624,647,648,653,654,870,871
